Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2207.25
Credential, defined.

Credential means a registration, license, or certificate.

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 76-2211.02;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 17;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.09;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 14.